Utah statutes.
16-10a-631.   Corporation's acquisition of its own shares.
(1)  A corporation may acquire its own shares and shares so acquired
constitute authorized but unissued shares.
(2)  If the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissuance of acquired
shares:
(a)  the number of authorized shares is reduced by the number of shares
acquired by the corporation, effective upon amendment of the articles of
incorporation; and
(b)  as provided in Section 16-10a-1002, the board of directors may adopt an
amendment to the articles of incorporation under Subsection (2)(a) without
shareholder action in order to reduce the number of authorized shares by an
amount equal to the number of shares acquired by the corporation.
(3)  A corporation amending its articles of incorporation pursuant to
Subsection (2) shall deliver to the division for filing articles of amendment
setting forth:
(a)  the name of the corporation;
(b)  the reduction in the number of authorized shares, itemized by class and
series;
(c)  the total number of authorized shares, itemized by class and series,
remaining after reduction of the shares; and
(d)  a statement that the amendment was adopted by the board of directors
without shareholder action and that shareholder action was not required.
